test/src/gt-norm-yamls/mrj1933-test-N-olma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - олма: # Noun '??'
     олма+N+Sg+Nom: олма
     олма+N+Sg+Gen: олман
     олма+N+Sg+Dat: олмалан
     олма+N+Sg+Acc: олмам
     олма+N+Sg+Lat: олмаэш
     олма+N+Sg+Ill: олмашкы
     олма+N+Sg+Ine: олмашты
     олма+N+Sg+Com: олмагэ
     олма+N+Sg+Abe: олматэ
     олма+N+Sg+Cmp: олмала
     олма+N+Pl+Nom: олмавлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Gen: олмавлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Dat: олмавлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Acc: олмавлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+Lat: олмавлӓш
     олма+N+Pl+Ill: олмавлӓшкӹ
     олма+N+Pl+Ine: олмавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+Com: олмавлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+Abe: олмавлӓде
     олма+N+Pl+Cmp: олмавлӓлӓ

#олмат, олмаэт, олмаэтшӹ, 
#олмажӹ, 
###
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: олмаэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: олмаэмӹн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: олмаэмлӓн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: олмаэмӹм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: олмаэшэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ill: олмашкэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ine: олмаштэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: олмаэмгэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: олмаэмтэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cmp: олмаэмлӓ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: олмавлӓэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: олмавлӓэмӹн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: олмавлӓэмлӓн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: олмавлӓэмӹм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: олмавлӓэшэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ill: олмавлӓшкэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ine: олмавлӓштэм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: олмавлӓэмгэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: олмавлӓэмтэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cmp: олмавлӓэмлӓ

###
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: олмаэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: олмаэдӹн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: олмаэтлӓн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: олмаэдӹм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: олмаэшэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ill: олмашкэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ine: олмаштэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: олмаэткэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abe: олмаэттэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cmp: олмаэтлӓ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: олмавлӓэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: олмавлӓэдӹн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: олмавлӓэтлӓн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: олмавлӓэдӹм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: олмавлӓэшэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ill: олмавлӓшкэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ine: олмавлӓштэт
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: олмавлӓэткэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abe: олмавлӓэттэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cmp: олмавлӓэтлӓ
###
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: олмажӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: олмажӹн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: олмажӹлӓн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: олмажӹм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: олмаэшӹжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ill: олмашкӹжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ine: олмаштӹжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: олмажӹгэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abe: олмажӹтэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cmp: олмажӹлӓ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: олмавлӓжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: олмавлӓӹн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: олмавлӓжӹлӓн
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: олмавлӓэдӹм
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: олмавлӓэшӹжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill: олмавлӓшкӹжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine: олмавлӓштӹжӹ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: олмавлӓжӹгэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe: олмавлӓжӹтэ
     олма+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cmp: олмавлӓжӹлӓ
